Nebraska, session 109, LB466.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB466 LB466
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-245, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-245 For purposes of the Nebraska Juvenile Code, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Abandonment means a parent's intentionally withholding from a
child, without just cause or excuse, the parent's presence, care, love,
protection, and maintenance and the opportunity for the display of
parental affection for the child;
(2) Age of majority means nineteen years of age;
(3) Alternative to detention means a program or directive that
increases supervision of a youth in the community in an effort to ensure
the youth attends court and refrains from committing a new law violation.
Alternative to detention includes, but is not limited to, electronic
monitoring, day and evening reporting centers, house arrest, tracking,
family crisis response, and temporary shelter placement. Except for the
use of manually controlled delayed egress of not more than thirty
seconds, placements that utilize physical construction or hardware to
restrain a youth's freedom of movement and ingress and egress from
placement are not considered alternatives to detention;
(4) Approved center means a center that has applied for and received
approval from the Director of the Office of Dispute Resolution under
section 25-2909;
(5) Civil citation means a noncriminal notice which cannot result in
a criminal record and is described in section 43-248.02;
(6) Cost or costs means (a) the sum or equivalent expended, paid, or
charged for goods or services, or expenses incurred, or (b) the
contracted or negotiated price;
(7) Criminal street gang means a group of three or more people with
a common identifying name, sign, or symbol whose group identity or
purposes include engaging in illegal activities;
(8) Criminal street gang member means a person who willingly or
-2-

LB466 LB466
2025 2025
voluntarily becomes and remains a member of a criminal street gang;
(9) Custodian means a nonparental caretaker having physical custody
of the juvenile and includes an appointee described in section 43-294;
(10) Guardian means a person, other than a parent, who has qualified
by law as the guardian of a juvenile pursuant to testamentary or court
appointment, but excludes a person who is merely a guardian ad litem;
(11) Juvenile means any person under the age of eighteen;
(12) Juvenile court means the separate juvenile court where it has
been established pursuant to sections 43-2,111 to 43-2,127 and the county
court sitting as a juvenile court in all other counties. Nothing in the
Nebraska Juvenile Code shall be construed to deprive the district courts
of their habeas corpus, common-law, or chancery jurisdiction or the
county courts and district courts of jurisdiction of domestic relations
matters as defined in section 25-2740;
(13) Juvenile detention facility has the same meaning as in section
83-4,125;
(14) Legal custody has the same meaning as in section 43-2922;
(15) Mental health facility means a treatment facility as defined in
section 71-914 or a government, private, or state hospital which treats
mental illness;
(16) Nonoffender means a juvenile who is subject to the jurisdiction
of the juvenile court for reasons other than legally prohibited conduct,
including, but not limited to, juveniles described in subdivision (3)(a)
of section 43-247;
(17) Parent means one or both parents or stepparents when the
stepparent is married to a parent who has physical custody of the
juvenile as of the filing of the petition;
(18) Parties means the juvenile as described in section 43-247 and
his or her parent, guardian, or custodian;
(19) Physical custody has the same meaning as in section 43-2922;
(20) Except in proceedings under the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare
-3-

LB466 LB466
2025 2025
Act, relative means father, mother, grandfather, grandmother, brother,
sister, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt,
first cousin, nephew, or niece;
(21) Restorative justice means practices, programs, or services that
emphasize repairing the harm caused to victims and the community by
persons who have caused the harm or committed an offense. Restorative
justice practices may include, but are not limited to, victim youth
conferencing, victim-offender mediation, youth or community dialogue,
panels, circles, and truancy mediation;
(22) Restorative justice facilitator means a qualified individual
who has been trained to facilitate restorative justice practices. A
qualified individual shall be approved by the referring county attorney,
city attorney, or juvenile or county court judge. Factors for approval
may include, but are not limited to, an individual's education and
training in restorative justice principles and practices; experience in
facilitating restorative justice sessions; understanding of the necessity
to do no harm to either the victim or the person who harmed the victim;
and proven commitment to ethical practices;
(23) Seal a record means that a record shall not be available to the
public except upon the order of a court upon good cause shown;
(24) Secure detention means detention in a highly structured,
residential, hardware-secured facility designed to restrict a juvenile's
movement;
(25) Staff secure juvenile facility means a juvenile residential
facility operated by a political subdivision (a) which does not include
construction designed to physically restrict the movements and activities
of juveniles who are in custody in the facility, (b) in which physical
restriction of movement or activity of juveniles is provided solely
through staff, (c) which may establish reasonable rules restricting
ingress to and egress from the facility, and (d) in which the movements
and activities of individual juvenile residents may, for treatment
-4-

LB466 LB466
2025 2025
purposes, be restricted or subject to control through the use of
intensive staff supervision. Staff secure juvenile facility does not
include any institution operated by the Department of Correctional
Services;
(26) Status offender means a juvenile who has been charged with or
adjudicated for conduct which would not be a crime if committed by an
adult, including, but not limited to, juveniles charged under subdivision
(3)(b) of section 43-247 and sections 53-180.01 and 53-180.02;
(27) Traffic offense means any nonfelonious act in violation of a
law or ordinance regulating vehicular or pedestrian travel, whether
designated a misdemeanor or a traffic infraction; and
(28) Young adult means an individual older than eighteen years of
age but younger than under twenty-one years of age.
Sec. 2. Original section 43-245, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-5-